Utah statutes.
58-77-602.   Immunity and liability.
(1)  If a Direct-entry midwife seeks to consult with, refer, or transfer a
client to a licensed health care provider or facility, the responsibility of
the provider or facility for the client does not begin until the client is
physically within the care of the provider or facility.
(2)  A licensed health care provider who examines a Direct-entry midwife's
client is only liable for the actual examination and cannot be held
accountable for the client's decision to pursue an out-of-hospital birth or
the services of a Direct-entry midwife.
(3) (a)  A licensed health care provider may, upon receiving a briefing data
from a Direct-entry midwife, issue a medical order for the Direct-entry
midwife's client, without that client being an explicit patient of the
provider.
(b)  Regardless of the advice given or order issued, the responsibility and
liability for caring for the client is that of the Direct-entry midwife.
(c)  The provider giving the order is responsible and liable only for the
appropriateness of the order given the data received.
(d)  The issuing of an order for a Direct-entry midwife's client does not
constitute a delegation of duties from the other provider to the Direct-entry
midwife.
(4)  A licensed health care provider may not be held civilly liable for
rendering emergency medical services that arise from prohibited conduct in
Section 58-77-603, or from care rendered under a waiver as specified in
Subsection 58-77-601(3)(b), unless the emergency medical services constitute
gross negligence or reckless disregard for the client.
(5)  A licensed Direct-entry midwife shall be solely responsible for the use
of medications under this chapter.
